Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1 Tennessee Securities Act of 1980
48-1-104. Securities registration requirement — Civil penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to sell any security in this state unless:

It is registered under this part;

The security or transaction is exempted under § 48-1-103; or

The security is a covered security.

The commissioner may, after notice and opportunity for a hearing under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, impose a civil penalty against any person found to be in violation of this section, or any rule or order adopted or issued under this section, in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, or in an amount not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per violation if an individual who is a designated adult is a victim.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 4; T.C.A., § 48-16-104; Acts 1997, ch. 164, § 3; 2001, ch. 61, § 2; T.C.A., § 48-2-104; Acts 2017, ch. 424, § 11.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-104 was transferred to § 48-1-104 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 42.

48-1-105. Registration by coordination.

Any security for which a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.), as amended, or a notification under Tier 1 of Regulation A of the Securities Act of 1933 (17 CFR 230.251 et seq.), as amended, has been filed in connection with the same offering may be registered by coordination as provided in this section.

A registration statement under this section shall contain the following information and be accompanied by the following documents in addition to the consent to service of process required by § 48-1-124(e):

If not included in the registration statement, one (1) copy of the latest form of prospectus or offering circular filed under the Securities Act of 1933 as amended, or Regulation A thereunder as amended, in a format approved by the commissioner;

If the commissioner by rule requires, a copy of the charter and bylaws (or their substantial equivalents) of the issuer, as then in effect, a copy of any agreements with or among underwriters, a copy of any indenture or other instrument governing the issuance of the security to be registered, and a specimen or copy of the security;

If the commissioner by rule requires, copies of any other documents filed under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or Regulation A, as amended, thereof;

An undertaking to forward promptly to the commissioner all amendments to the prospectus or offering circular; and

If the commissioner by rule or order requires, such other information as is necessary to determine that the registration statement does not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.

A registration statement under this section which has been filed with the securities and exchange commission (SEC) automatically becomes effective with the commissioner when it is declared effective by the SEC if all the following conditions are satisfied:

No stop order is in effect and no proceeding is pending under § 48-1-108;

The registration statement has been on file with the commissioner for at least twenty (20) days; and

A statement of the maximum and minimum proposed offering prices and the maximum underwriting discounts and commissions has been on file for two (2) full business days or such shorter period as the commissioner permits by rule or order and the offering is made within those limitations.

The registrant shall promptly notify the commissioner, by telephone or other electronic means, of the date and time when the registration statement or notification filed with the SEC is declared effective by the SEC and the contents of the price amendment, if any, and shall promptly file a post-effective amendment containing the information and documents in the price amendment. “Price amendment” means the final amendment filed with the SEC, which includes a statement of the offering price, underwriting and selling discounts or commissions, amount of proceeds, conversion rates, call prices, and other matters dependent upon the offering price.

The commissioner may by rule or order waive either or both of the conditions specified in subdivisions (c)(1)(B) and (C). If the registration statement or notification filed with the SEC is declared effective by the SEC before all the conditions in this subsection (c) are satisfied and they are not waived, the registration statement automatically becomes effective with the commissioner as soon as all the conditions are satisfied.

If the registrant advises the commissioner of the date when the registration statement or notification filed with the SEC is expected to be declared effective, the commissioner shall promptly advise the registrant, by telephone or other electronic means, at the registrant's expense, whether or not all the conditions are satisfied and whether or not the commissioner then contemplates the institution of a proceeding under § 48-1-108. This notice by the commissioner does not preclude the institution of such a proceeding at any time.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 5; T.C.A., § 48-16-105; Acts 1986, ch. 596, § 2; 2001, ch. 61, § 3; T.C.A., § 48-2-105; Acts 2017, ch. 424, §§ 12-18.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-105 was transferred to § 48-1-105 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

48-1-106. Registration by qualification.

Any security may be registered by qualifications as provided in this section.

A registration statement under this section shall contain the following information and be accompanied by the following documents, in addition to the consent to service of process required by § 48-1-124(e):

If not included in the registration statement, one (1) copy of an offering circular or prospectus in a format approved by the commissioner, containing such financial statements and such information, including information concerning the securities offered, the offering, the issuer, the issuer's promoters, directors, officers, security holders and personnel, material contracts, litigation, transactions, and remuneration, as the commissioner shall specify by rule;

A specimen or copy of the security being registered, a copy of the issuer's charter and bylaws (or their substantial equivalents), as then in effect, and a copy of any indenture or other instrument defining the rights of the holders of the security to be registered;

A signed copy of an opinion of counsel as to the legality of the security being registered, and to the effect that the security, when sold, shall be legally issued, fully paid, nonassessable and, if a debt security, a binding obligation of the issuer;

The written consent of any accountant, attorney, engineer, appraiser, or other person whose profession gives authority to a statement made by the accountant, attorney, engineer, appraiser, or other person, if any such person is named as having prepared or certified a report or valuation (other than a public and official document or statement) which is used in connection with the registration statement;

A copy of any notice, circular, advertisement, sales literature, or communication, which is to be used in connection with the offering, containing such information as the commissioner may require by rule and subject to such terms and conditions as may be prescribed therein; and

If the commissioner by rule or order requires such additional information or documents as are necessary to determine that the registration statement does not include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.

A registration statement under this section shall become effective twenty (20) days following filing unless the commissioner by order specifies an earlier effective date, or the commissioner may by order defer the effective date for any reason shown to be in the public interest and necessary for the protection of investors.

A prospectus which is part of a registration statement effective under this section shall be delivered to any purchaser at or prior to the execution by the purchaser of a written agreement to purchase, the delivery of a confirmation of sale, or the payment for securities offered by means of such prospectus, whichever occurs first.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 6; T.C.A., § 48-16-106; Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 4; T.C.A., § 48-2-106; Acts 2017, ch. 424, § 19.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-106 was transferred to § 48-1-106 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

48-1-107. Provisions applicable to registration generally.

A registration statement with respect to a security may be filed by the issuer or a broker-dealer registered under this part.

Every person filing a registration statement under §§ 48-1-105 and 48-1-106 shall pay a filing fee of one tenth of one percent (0.1%) of the maximum aggregate offering price at which the registered securities are to be offered in this state, but the fee shall in no case be more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor less than an amount which the commissioner shall by rule establish. When a registration statement is withdrawn before the effective date or before a preeffective stop order is entered under § 48-1-108, the commissioner shall retain the minimum filing fee established pursuant to this subsection (b) and return the remainder of the fee, if any, to the applicant.

Every registration statement shall specify:

The amount of securities to be offered in this state;

The states in which a registration statement or similar document in connection with the offering has been or is to be filed; and

Any adverse order, judgment, or decree entered in connection with the offering by the regulatory authorities in any state or by any court or by the securities and exchange commission.

The commissioner may by order permit the omission of any item of information or document from any registration statement if the commissioner finds that the omission of such information or document is in the public interest and inclusion of such information or document is not necessary for the protection of investors.

The commissioner may by rule declare standards of fairness and reasonableness concerning securities offerings generally and may by rule or order require as a condition of registration that:

Any security issued to a promoter within the past three (3) years or to be issued to a promoter for a consideration substantially different from the public offering price, or to any person for a consideration other than cash, be deposited in escrow for a reasonable period; and

The proceeds from the sale of the security registered in this state be held in escrow until the issuer receives a specified amount from the sale of the security either in this state or elsewhere;

provided, that any such order be clearly shown to be in the public interest and necessary for the protection of investors. The commissioner may by rule determine the conditions of any escrow required hereunder, but the commissioner may not reject a depository solely because of its location in another state.

Every registration statement is effective for one (1) year from its effective date, unless the commissioner is sooner notified of the completion of the offering, or unless such registration is sooner terminated by order of the commissioner. Notwithstanding the foregoing, when a prospectus is used more than nine (9) months after the effective date of the registration statement, the information contained therein shall be as of a date not more than sixteen (16) months prior to such use.

Renewal registration for the succeeding one-year period may be issued upon written application and upon payment of fees as provided by this section for original registration, even though the maximum fee was paid in the preceding period, without the filing of further statements or furnishing of any further information except as the commissioner by rule requires. All applications for renewal received after the expiration of the previous registration shall be treated as original applications.

So long as a registration statement is effective, the person who filed the registration statement shall file such reports as the commissioner shall by rule require, keep reasonably current the information contained in the registration statement, and disclose the progress of the offering. For the purpose of avoiding unnecessary duplication, the commissioner, insofar as the commissioner deems it practicable in administering this subsection (h), may cooperate with the securities administrators of other jurisdictions, the securities and exchange commission, any national securities exchange or national securities association registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.), as amended, and any association of securities administrators.

Any prospectus shall contain such other information as the commissioner may by rule require as being in the public interest and necessary for the protection of investors.

In the exercise of the commissioner's power under this section, § 48-1-105 or § 48-1-106, the commissioner shall have authority by rule to classify prospectuses according to the nature and circumstances of their use or the nature of the security, issue, issuer, or otherwise, and, subject to such terms and conditions as the commissioner shall specify therein, to prescribe as to each class the form and contents which the commissioner may find to be in the public interest and necessary for the protection of investors.

A registration statement may be withdrawn prior to its effectiveness or the issuance of a preeffective stop order under § 48-1-108. An effective registration statement may be withdrawn otherwise only in the discretion of the commissioner.

A registration statement relating to a security may be amended after its effective date so as to increase the securities specified as proposed to be offered. As to securities not yet sold, such an amendment becomes effective when the commissioner so orders. In the case of securities which are sold in an amount in excess of the amount or number of securities specified in an effective registration statement, as proposed to be offered, the person or persons who filed the registration statement may, in accordance with rules the commissioner shall promulgate as in the public interest and necessary for the protection of investors, elect to have the registration of those securities deemed effective as of the time of their sale, upon payment to the commissioner, within six (6) months after the sale, of a registration fee equal to the difference between the registration fee previously paid and the amount of the fee which would have otherwise been applicable to those additional securities had they been included in the registration statement, if any, plus a late registration fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Upon such an election and payment, the registration statement shall be considered to have been in effect with respect to those shares. Every person filing an amendment under this subsection (m) shall pay a filing fee, calculated in the manner specified in subsection (b), with respect to the additional securities.

Any amendment to a registration statement which changes the name of the offering of securities shall pay a processing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) payable upon the amendment's filing with the commissioner.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 7; 1981, ch. 459, § 1; T.C.A., § 48-16-107; Acts 1988, ch. 663, § 1; 1993, ch. 98, §§ 4-8; 1996, ch. 1072, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 61, §§ 5-7; T.C.A., § 48-2-107; Acts 2017, ch. 424, §§ 20-22.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-107 was transferred to § 48-1-107 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

Law Reviews.

Federal State Relations Under the Federal Securities Code (Jeffery B. Bartell), 32 Vand. L. Rev. 457.

48-1-108. Stop order denying, suspending, or revoking registration.

The commissioner may issue a stop order denying effectiveness to, or suspending or revoking the effectiveness of, any registration statement if the commissioner finds that:

The order is in the public interest; and

The registration statement, or any amendment under § 48-1-107 (as of its effective date or as of the date of an order denying effectiveness), or any report under § 48-1-107(h) includes any untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements made therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;

Any provision of this part or any rule, order or condition lawfully imposed under this part has been willfully violated in connection with the offering by:

The person filing the registration statement;

The issuer, any partner, officer, or director of the issuer, any person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, or any person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the issuer, but only if the person filing the registration statement is directly or indirectly controlled by or acting for the issuer; or

Any underwriter;

The security registered or sought to be registered is the subject of an administrative stop order or similar order or a permanent or temporary injunction of any court of competent jurisdiction entered under any other federal or state act applicable to the offering; provided, that the commissioner may not:

Institute a proceeding against an effective registration statement under this subdivision (a)(2)(C) more than one (1) year from the date of the order or injunction relied on; or

Enter an order under this subdivision (a)(2)(C) on the basis of an order or injunction entered under any other state act, unless that order or injunction was based on facts which would currently constitute a ground for a stop order under this section;

The issuer's enterprise or method of business includes or would include activities which are illegal where performed;

The offering has worked or tended to work a fraud upon purchasers or would so operate;

When a security is sought to be registered by coordination, there has been a failure to comply with the undertaking required by § 48-1-105(b)(4); or

The applicant or registrant has failed to pay the proper filing fee; provided, that the commissioner may enter only a denial order under this subdivision (a)(2)(G) and the commissioner shall vacate any such order when the deficiency has been corrected.

No order may be entered under any part of this section without full compliance with § 48-1-116. Upon issuance of an order under this section, the commissioner shall give notice of the issuance of such order and of the reasons therefor and opportunity for hearing by personal service or by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the addressee's last known business mailing address. The commissioner shall vacate or modify the order at any time for good cause or if such registration statement or prospectus has been filed or amended in accordance with such order.

The commissioner may not institute a stop order proceeding against an effective registration statement on the basis of a fact or transaction known to the commissioner when the registration statement became effective, unless the proceeding is instituted within the thirty (30) days immediately following the date the registration statement became effective.

In any case in which the commissioner is authorized to issue a stop order denying, suspending or revoking the effective registration of the securities of an issuer, the commissioner may impose a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000) upon the issuer of such securities for all violations arising from any single transaction.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 8; T.C.A., § 48-16-108; Acts 1996, ch. 1072, §§ 6, 8; T.C.A., § 48-2-108; Acts 2017, ch. 424, § 23.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-108 was transferred to § 48-1-108 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

Law Reviews.

SEC Injunctions, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 427 (2001).

48-1-109. Registration as broker-dealers, agents, investment advisers, and investment adviser representatives.

It is unlawful for any person to transact business from, in, or into this state as a broker-dealer or agent unless such person is registered as a broker-dealer or agent under this part, except that:

A bank shall be exempt from registration as a broker-dealer to the extent its activities are excepted under either the definition of “broker” in § 3(a)(4)(B) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78c(a)(4)(B)), or the definition of “dealer” in § 3(a)(5)(C) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78c(a)(5)(C));

A person who limits such person's activity as a broker-dealer to acting solely as a broker-dealer with regard to charitable gift annuities, as that term is defined by § 56-52-102, shall be exempt from registration as a broker-dealer;

A person who limits such person's activity as an agent to acting solely as an agent on behalf of a person who is eligible for the exemption from broker-dealer registration in subdivision (a)(2) shall be exempt from registration as an agent.

It is unlawful for any broker-dealer to employ an agent to transact business as an agent unless the agent is registered under this part. The registration of an agent is not effective during any period when the agent is not associated with a particular broker-dealer registered under this part. When an agent begins or terminates a connection with a broker-dealer, or begins or terminates those activities which make such person an agent, both the agent and the broker-dealer shall promptly notify the commissioner.

It is unlawful for any person to transact business from, in, or into this state as an investment adviser or investment adviser representative unless:

The person is registered as an investment adviser or investment adviser representative under this part;

The person is required to register as an investment adviser pursuant to § 203 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80b-3); provided, however, that an initial notice filing, consisting of any documents filed with the securities and exchange commission, a consent to service of process, and a nonrefundable fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be filed with the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, with payment of any reasonable costs charged by the designee for processing such filings, ten (10) days prior to the person acting as an investment adviser; and a renewal notice filing containing such information as the commissioner by rule requires and a nonrefundable fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be filed with the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, with payment of any reasonable costs charged by the designee for processing such filing for each successive year in which such person acts as such investment adviser; every notice filing of an investment adviser expires annually, unless timely renewed, on December 31 of each year; or

The person's only clients in this state are insurance companies.

Every registration of a broker-dealer or investment adviser expires annually, unless timely renewed, on December 31 of each year.

Every registration of an agent or investment adviser representative expires annually, unless timely renewed, on December 31 of each year.

Every notice filing of an investment adviser expires annually, unless timely renewed, on December 31 of each year.

A registration or notice filing is timely renewed if the renewal application, all required exhibits, and fees are on file with the commissioner by December 31 of each year.

The commissioner may, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, impose a civil penalty against any person found to be in violation of this section, or any rule or order adopted or issued under this section, in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, or in an amount not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per violation if an individual who is a designated adult is a victim.

It is unlawful for any investment adviser to employ an investment adviser representative unless the investment adviser representative is registered under this part. The registration of an investment adviser representative is not effective during any period when the investment adviser representative is not associated with a particular investment adviser. When an investment adviser representative begins or terminates a connection with an investment adviser, or begins or terminates those activities which make that person an investment adviser representative, both the investment adviser representative and the investment adviser shall promptly notify the commissioner.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a Canadian broker-dealer that is resident in Canada and has no office or other physical presence in the United States and is not an office of, branch of, or a natural person associated with, a broker-dealer otherwise registered in the United States may transact business in this state without registering with the commissioner of commerce and insurance as a broker-dealer under the following conditions:

The business transacted in this state by the Canadian broker-dealer must be limited to the effecting of or attempt to effect transactions in securities:

With or for a natural person who regularly resides in Canada and who is temporarily present in this state and with whom the Canadian broker-dealer had a bona fide customer relationship before the natural person entered the United States; or

With or for a natural person who is a resident of this state, or is temporarily present in this state, and who contributes to, or is or will be entitled to receive the income and assets from, a Canadian retirement account;

The Canadian broker-dealer files the following with the commissioner of commerce and insurance:

An annual notice in the form prescribed by the commissioner of commerce and insurance;

A consent to service of process; and

An annual fee of two hundred dollars ($200);

The Canadian broker-dealer is a member of a self-regulatory organization or stock exchange in Canada;

The Canadian broker-dealer maintains its provincial or territorial registration and its membership in a self-regulatory organization or stock exchange in good standing;

The Canadian broker-dealer discloses to its customers in this state that the Canadian broker-dealer is not subject to the full regulatory requirements of this part; and

The Canadian broker-dealer is not in violation of § 48-1-121 and all rules promulgated thereunder.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a Canadian agent representing a Canadian broker-dealer transacting business in this state pursuant to this section need not register with the commissioner of commerce and insurance as an agent; provided, that such agent is registered in good standing in the appropriate Canadian jurisdiction.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 9; T.C.A., § 48-16-109; Acts 1985, ch. 26, § 2; 1997, ch. 164, § 4; 2001, ch. 61, §§ 8-10; 2001, ch. 80, § 3; 2002, ch. 517, §§ 2, 3; 2002, ch. 550, §§ 2-5; 2002, ch. 700, § 7; T.C.A., § 48-2-109; Acts 2017, ch. 424, §§ 24-29.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-109 was transferred to § 48-1-109 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

Acts 2002, ch. 700, § 8 provided that the commissioner of commerce and insurance may promulgate rules and regulations, including public necessity rules (now emergency rules) and regulations, to administer the provisions of this part. Such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Occupation tax on broker-dealers, agents and advisors, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.